examples/patterns/hyph-de-1996-compound.pat.txt
.ab5a
.ab3bat
.ab5bau.
.ab7baus.
.ab7bruch.
.ab7bruchs.
.abel2
.aben2
.abendgottes8
.ab7fahrt.
.ab7fall.
.ab7falls.
.ab7fertigung.
.ab7fertigunge
.ab7findung.
.ab7findunge
.ab7fluss.
.ab7flusse
.ab3fo
.ab7fuhr.
.ab7gabe.
.ab7gaben.
.ab7gang.
.ab7gangs.
.ab7gase.
.ab7gasen.
.ab7geltung.
.ab7geordnete.
.ab7geordneter
.abgewirt7
.ab7grenzung.
.ab7grenzunge
.ab7guss.
.ab7gusse
.ab3hä
.ab3he
.ab7itur.
.ab7lage.
.ab7lagen
.ab7lagerung.
.ab7lagerunge
.ab7lauf.
.ab7laufs.
.ab1lä
.ab1le
.ab7löse.
.ab7lösung.
.ab7nahme.
.ab7nahmen
.ab7nehmer.
.ab7nehmern
.ab7nehmers.
.ab1or
.ab7rechnung.
.ab7rechnunge
.ab7rede.
.ab7reden
.ab7rüstung.
.ab7satz.
.ab7satzes
.ab1sc
.ab7schiebung.
.ab7schiebunge
.ab7schiede
.ab7schluss.
.ab7schlusses
.ab7schuss.
.ab7schusse
.ab7stand.
.ab7stande
.ab7stands.
.ab7stieg.
.ab7stimmung.
.ab7stimmunge
.ab7sturz.
.ab7sturze
.ab1t
.ab7treibung.
.ab7treibunge
.ab7wärts.
.ab7wehr.
.abzu4
.ab7zugs.
.acht3u
.achtund7
.ack2
.ad1a
.ad7apter.
.ad7aptern
.ad7apters
.ad3d
.ade2
.ad2r
.ag2
.al4
.all2e
.all7gemeine
.all7tag.
.all7tags.
.alpha3
.alz2
.am2
.amt2s1
.an1
.aner2
.anerkennt7
.an7fang.
.an7fangs.
.anfällig7k
.ang2
.an7gebots.
.angehörig7k
.angelegen7h
.an7griff.
.an7griffe
.an7griffs.
.angs2
.angst3
.an3heb
.an7kauf.
.an7kaufs.
.an7kunft.
.an7lage.
.an7lagen.
.an3las
.an7lauf.
.an7laufs.
.an3le
.an7leihe.
.an7leihen.
.an7meldu
.an7mer
.an7passung.
.an7passunge
.an7rainer.
.an7satz.
.an7satze
.an7schluss.
.an7schlusses
.an7sicht.
.an7sichte
.an3s4p
.anti5ge
.an7trags.
.an7tritt.
.an7tritte
.an7walt.
.an7walte
.an7walts.
.an7walt7sc
.an7wender.
.an7wendung.
.an7wendunge
.anz2
.an7zeige.
.an7zeigen.
.an7zeigend
.an7zeiger
.anzu4
.aos4
.apo7theke.
.apo7theken.
.ar2
.arbeits7los.
.arbeits7lose.
.arbeits7loser
.ar3h
.arl7berg.
.arl7berge
.arl7bergs.
.ar4m
.arm3ac
.aro2
.ar4p
.art3ei
.art5erh
.as4
.at2
.atmo3
.ato4
.au2
.auf7bau.
.auf7baus.
.auf7bauten
.auf7enthalt.
.auf7enthalte
.auf7enthalts.
.auffällig7k
.auf7führung.
.auf7führunge
.auf7gabe.
.auf7gaben.
.auf5gan
.auf5ge
.auf7klärung.
.auf7lage.
.auf7lagen.
.auf7lösb
.auf7lösung.
.auf7lösunge
.auf7nahme.
.auf7nahmen
.auf3ne
.auf7ruf.
.auf7sicht.
.auf7sichte
.auf3sp
.auf7stieg.
.auf7takt.
.auf7trag.
.auf7trage
.auf7trags.
.auf7tragt
.auf7tragu
.auf5trä
.auf7trieb.
.auf7triebs.
.auf7tritt.
.auf7tritte
.auf5wan
.auf7wärts.
.aufzu4
.au4h
.aus7bau.
.aus7baus.
.aus7bildung.
.aus7bildunge
.au4sc
.aus7druck.
.aus7drucks.
.aus3fä
.aus7flug.
.aus7fluge
.aus7flugs.
.aus7fuhr.
.aus7fuhren
.aus7führung.
.aus7führunge
.aus7gabe.
.aus7gaben.
.aus7gang.
.aus7gange
.aus7gangs.
.aus3gä
.aus3h
.aus7kunft.
.aus7kunfte
.aus7lastung.
.au4sp
.aus7rüstung.
.aus7rüstunge
.aus7sage.
.aus7sagen.
.aus7schuss.
.aus7schusse
.aus7sicht.
.aus7sichte
.aus7stiegs.
.aus7tausch.
.aus7tausche
.aus7tauschs.
.aus5tes
.aus7wahl.
.aus7wärts.
.aus3z
.auszu4
.auto7mat.
.auto7mate.
.auto7maten.
.auto7matik.
.auto7matike
.auto7matio
.auto7nomie.
.ähn3
.änn1
.är2
.ärsch3
.äst3c
.ät2
.äug3l
.ba2
.bak4
.baro7meter.
.bar7scha
.bar3te
.bär1c
.bäum3c
.be1
.be7amte.
.be7amten.
.be7amtent
.be7amter
.be5amti
.be7bauung.
.be7darf.
.be7darfe
.be7darfs.
.be7dienung.
.be7dienunge
.bedürf7nis.
.bedürf7niss
.be3fa
.be7fehl.
.be7fehle
.be7fehls.
.be7freiung.
.be7freiunge
.be3fu
.befug5n
.be3ge
.be7gegnung.
.be7gegnunge
.be7gehrens.
.begräb7nis.
.begräb7nisse
.be7grenzung.
.be7grenzunge
.be7griffs.
.be7grüssung.
.be7grüßung.
.be7handlung.
.be7handlunge
.be7hebung.
.be7hebunge
.be7hörde.
.be7hörden.
.bei7falls.
.bei1h
.bei7lage.
.bei7lagen.
.bei7rat.
.bei7rate
.bei7rats.
.bei3rä
.bei7trag.
.bei7trage
.bei7trags.
.bei5trä
.bei7tritt.
.beizu4
.be3k
.bekennt7nis.
.bekennt7niss
.be7lastung.
.be7lastunge
.be5lege
.be7legs.
.be7legschaft.
.be7legung.
.be7legunge
.be7leihung.
.be7leihunge
.bel4f
.ben4
.be3nei
.be3nen
.bens2
.be7nutzen
.be7nutzer.
.be7nutzerinn
.be7nutzern.
.be7nutzers.
.be7nutzt
.be7nutzung.
.be7nutzunge
.be7obachtung.
.be7obachtunge
.ber4
.be5rate
.be7ratung.
.be7ratunge
.be7rechnung.
.be7rechnunge
.be7reit.
.be7reite
.be7reitu
.berg3a
.berg5eb
.berge5s
.berg3r
.bericht7er
.be7richts.
.be5ruf.
.be5rufe
.be5rufl
.be7rufs.
.be7rufst.
.be5ruft
.be7rufung.
.be7rufunge
.be7rührung.
.be4sat
.be7satzung.
.be7schäd
.be7schäftigt.
.be7schwerde.
.be7schwerden
.be3se
.be4sen
.be3sp
.be7stechung.
.be7such.
.be7suche.
.be7suchen
.be7sucher.
.be7sucherin.
.be7sucherinn
.be7suchern
.be7suchers.
.be7suches
.be7suchs.
.be7sucht
.be7tätigung.
.be7teiligung.
.be7teiligunge
.be7tone.
.be7tonst.
.be5tont
.be3tra
.be7treuung.
.be7trieb.
.be7triebe
.be7triebl
.be7triebs.
.be5trif
.be7trug.
.be7truge
.be7trugs.
.bett3t
.bet3tu
.bet5tüc
.be7völkerung.
.be7völkerunge
.be7wachung.
.be7wegung.
.be7wegunge
.be7werb.
.be7werbe.
.be7werber.
.be7werberi
.be7werbern
.be7werbers.
.be7werbes
.be7werbung.
.be7wertung.
.be7wertunge
.bewirt7s
.be7zirk.
.be7zirke
.be7zirks.
.be5zug.
.be5zuge
.be7zugs.
.bezüg5l
.biblio7thek.
.biblio7theke
.bi3enn
.bild5ni
.bi1na
.bio3
.bis7tum.
.bis7tums.
.bläs3c
.blechwalz7
.blind5h
.blüm3
.bo2
.bot7schaft.
.bot7schaften
.bot7schafter.
.bröt7chen.
.bruch6k
.buch5st
.bünd7nis.
.bünd7nisse
.bürg5sc
.ch4
.co4
.con7tainer.
.con7tainern
.da5her.
.da5hin.
.da1l
.dar5in.
.dar7lehen.
.darm1
.dar1s
.dar3um
.da7sein.
.da7seins.
.datei3
.de4b
.de3i
.de2kr
.de2l
.de1mi
.demo3k
.de3mon
.den2k
.denk3l
.de1o
.de3ran
.der4en
.der4n
.der4wi
.de1se
.de1sk
.de1st
.de1te
.dia7gnose.
.dia7gnosen
.dia7log.
.dia7loge
.dia7logs.
.dien2
.diener7s
.dien3l
.dio2
.di3ox
.dis7kussion.
.dis7kussione
.dis5kut
.dis7play.
.dis7plays.
.do2
.dorf1
.dös1c
.drei7hundert.
.drei3u
.dreiund7
.durch7flusses
.durch7gang.
.durch7gange
.durch7gangs.
.durch5l
.eb2
.eben3d
.eber4h
.ed4
.efer2
.eg2
.ehe1
.ehe3i
.eigen7schaft.
.eigen7schafte
.eigen7tum.
.eigen7tums.
.eigen7tümer.
.eigen7tümeri
.eigen7tümern
.eigen7tümers.
.ei2n
.ein1a
.ein3an
.ein7bruch.
.ein7bruchs.
.ein3bu
.ein7fluss.
.ein7flusse
.ein7fuhr.
.ein7fuhre
.ein7gabe.
.ein7gaben
.ein7gang.
.ein7gange
.ein7gangs.
.ein3gä
.eingeständ7
.ein3ha
.ein6jah
.ein7kauf.
.ein7kaufs.
.ein3kä
.ein6kom
.ein7kommen.
.ein7kommens.
.ein4ku
.ein7nahme.
.ein7nahmen.
.ein7nahmt
.ein8part
.ein3r
.ein7satz.
.ein7satze
.ein3sä
.ein7sparung.
.ein7sparunge
.ein7stand.
.ein5ste
.ein7stieg.
.ein5tra
.ein7tritt.
.ein7tritte
.ein1u
.einund5
.einzu4
.ein7zug.
.ein7zugs.
.ei3sch
.eis3l
.ei2sp
.eis1t
.el4
.elch3t
.em2
.emm2
.emp1f
.emp7fang.
.emp7fangs.
.emp7fehlen.
.emp7fehlens.
.emp7fehlung.
.emp7fehlunge
.em4s
.en2
.end3er4
.end1r
.en4g
.ent1
.ent3b
.ent7faltung.
.ent7fernung.
.ent7fernunge
.ent5gel
.ent3h
.ent7lastung.
.ent7lastunge
.ent7sorgung.
.ent7stehung.
.ent7wicke
.ent7wickle.
.ent7wickler.
.ent7wicklern
.ent7wicklers
.ent7wicklung.
.ent7wicklunge
.ent7wurf.
.ent7wurfs.
.ent3wü
.epi3d
.epi7sode.
.epi7soden.
.er1bi
.er3bo
.er8brecht
.er4dar
.er4din
.er7dung.
.er1e
.ereig7nis.
.ereig7nisse
.er7fahrung.
.er7fahrunge
.er7fassung.
.er7fassunge
.er7findung.
.er7folg.
.er7folge
.er7folgs.
.er7folgst.
.er7folgt
.erforder7ni
.er3ga
.er7gänzung.
.er7geb7nis.
.er7geb7nisse
.er3gi
.er3gl
.er3gu
.er1h
.er3ha
.er7haltung.
.er7haltunge
.er5han
.er6hart
.er7hebung.
.er7hebunge
.er7holung.
.er3hö
.er7innerung.
.er7innerunge
.er3ka
.er7kennb
.er7kenne
.er7kenns
.er7kennt.
.er7kennt7nis.
.er7kennt7nisse
.er7kennung.
.er7kennunge
.er7klärung.
.er7klärunge
.er3ko
.er7kundung.
.er3la
.erlaub7n
.er7lebens.
.er7leb7nis.
.er7leb7niss
.er5lös.
.er3lu
.er7mittle
.er7mittlung.
.er7mittlunge
.ermög3
.ern2
.er1na
.er7nährt
.er7nährung.
.er7nährunge
.er1ne
.er3neu
.er7neuerung.
.er1ob
.er7oberung.
.er7oberunge
.er7öffne
.er7öffnung.
.er7öffnunge
.er7probung.
.er3r
.ers2
.er7satz.
.er7satze
.er7scheinung.
.er7scheinunge
.er1si
.er1so
.erspar7nis.
.erspar7niss
.er3ste
.er8stein
.er6ster
.er8stritt.
.er8strit7ten.
.er1su
.er1t
.er7trag.
.er7trage
.er7trags.
.er7wartung.
.er7wartunge
.er7weiterung.
.er7weiterunge
.er7werb.
.er7werbs.
.erwirt5
.er1zä
.er1ze
.erzeug7n
.er7ziehb
.er7ziehe
.er7ziehs
.er7zieht
.er7ziehung.
.er7ziehunge
.er5ziel
.es4
.esel4s
.est2a
.et2
.eu2
.ex7amen.
.ex7amens.
.ex1em
.ex1er
.ex7pansion.
.ex7pansione
.ex7pedition.
.ex7peditione
.ex7perte.
.ex7perten.
.ex7perti
.ex7ploration.
.ex7ploratione
.ex7plosion.
.ex7plosione
.ex7port.
.ex7porte.
.ex7porten.
.ex7ports.
.ex1te
.fa4
.fach7schule
.fähig5k
.fällig7keit.
.fällig7keite
.fe4
.feind3
.fel2
.fer4
.fertig7k
.festig7k
.fi2
.fil4
.findig7k
.finster7n
.flöck3
.flug7hafen.
.flug7hafens.
.flug5hä
.flücht7ling.
.flücht7linge
.frau3s
.fräu1
.frei7heit.
.frei7heite
.freudig7k
.freund7l
.früh7ling.
.fuß7baller.
.fünf3u
.fünfund7
.für3w
.füss3c
.ga4
.gan4
.gd2
.ge1
.ge3ba
.ge7bäude.
.ge7bäuden.
.ge7bäudes.
.ge5bet.
.ge7bets.
.ge7biets.
.ge7birge
.ge7brauchs.
.ge3buc
.ge3bud
.ge3bum
.ge3bun
.ge7burt.
.ge7burten.
.ge7bühr.
.ge7bühren.
.ge7bührl
.ge7danke.
.ge7danken.
.ge7dankt
.ge7dächt7nis.
.ge7dächt7nisse
.ge3däm
.ge7denk.
.ge3e
.ge7fahr.
.ge7fahren.
.ge7fahrene
.ge7fangen.
.ge7fangene.
.ge7fangenem
.ge7fangenen.
.ge7fangener
.ge7fangenes
.ge7fangensc
.ge7fäng7nis.
.ge7fäng7nisse.
.ge7fäng7nissen
.ge7fäng7nisses
.ge7fäss.
.ge7fässe.
.ge7fässen
.ge7fässes
.ge5fäß.
.ge5fäße
.ge7fechts.
.ge3fu
.ge3fü
.ge7fühls.
.ge3ga
.ge3geb
.gegen7wä
.gegenzu8
.ge3ges
.ge3gl
.ge3go
.ge3gr
.ge7halt.
.ge7halte
.ge7halts.
.ge5häuf
.ge7häuse.
.ge7häusen
.ge7häuses.
.ge5häut
.ge5heil
.ge7heim.
.ge7heim7nis.
.ge7heim7niss
.ge5heis
.ge5heiß
.ge5heiz
.ge7hirn.
.ge7hirns.
.ge3hu
.ge3im
.ge3ir
.ge3k
.gel2
.ge7lände.
.ge7länder.
.ge7ländes.
.geld3
.gelegen7heit.
.gelegen7heite
.ge3lu
.ge3lü
.ge7mälde.
.ge7mälden
.ge7mäldes.
.ge7mein.
.ge7meinde.
.ge7meinden.
.ge7meine
.ge7meinst
.ge7meint
.ge3mel
.ge3men
.ge3mer
.ge3mes
.ge7müse.
.ge7müsen
.ge7müses.
.genauig7keit.
.gen2e
.ge3neh
.ge7nehmigung.
.ge7nehmigunge
.ge3nei
.gen2r
.gen3te
.ge7nuss.
.ge7nusse
.ge3nut
.ge7päck.
.ge7päcke
.ge7päcks.
.ge3päp
.ger4
.ge7radel
.ge3rat
.ge5rät.
.ge7räte.
.ge7räten
.ge7rätes.
.ge5räts
.gerät7sc
.ge7richt.
.ge7richte
.ge7richtl
.ge7richts.
.ge7richtsba
.gerichtsbar7
.ge7riere
.ge7rölle
.ge3ru
.ge7ruchs.
.ges2
.ge3sac
.ge3sag
.ge3sal
.ge5samm
.ge7samt.
.ge5sand
.ge7sang.
.ge7sangs.
.ge3sau
.ge7schäd
.ge7schäft.
.ge7schäfte.
.ge7schäften
.ge7schäftes
.ge7schäfts.
.ge7schäl
.ge7schär
.ge7schät
.gescheh7n
.ge7schirrs.
.ge7setz.
.ge7setze.
.ge7setzen.
.ge7setzes.
.ge7setzl
.ge7setzt
.ge7sichts.
.ge7spräch.
.ge7spräche
.ge7sprächs.
.ge5spro
.ge7staltung.
.ge7staltunge
.geständ7n
.ge7steins.
.ge3sto
.ge7sund.
.ge7sund7heit.
.ge5sung
.ge5sunk
.ge7tränk.
.ge7tränke.
.ge7tränken
.ge7treide.
.ge7treiden
.ge7treides.
.ge3tri
.ge3tü
.ge3ü
.gewahr7s
.ge7walt.
.ge7walti
.ge7wächs.
.ge7wächse
.ge7webe.
.ge7weben
.ge7webes
.ge7werbe.
.ge7werbes.
.ge7winde.
.ge7windes.
.ge5wink
.ge7winn.
.ge7winne.
.ge7winnen
.ge7winner.
.ge7winneri
.ge7winnern
.ge7winners.
.ge7winnes
.ge7winns.
.ge7winnst.
.ge7winnt.
.ge7winnung.
.ge7winnunge
.gewirt5
.ge3z
.gläubig7k
.gleich7nis.
.glöck3
.go2
.gross7el
.groß5el
.groß7väter.
.grund7stück.
.grund7stücks.
.gs2
.guss1
.gültig7keit.
.haf2
.hal4
.haupt7amt.
.haupt7amte
.haus3g
.haus7halt.
.haus7halts.
.haut1
.häpp1
.häus3c
.he4
.hef2
.heil7bad
.heilig7k
.hel2
.hellig7keit.
.hemd3c
.hen4
.heran5
.her5an.
.her7aus.
.her4e
.her7ein.
.her5inn
.her7kunft.
.her6man
.herr7schaft.
.herr7schafte
.her7stellb
.her7stelle.
.her7stellen
.her7steller.
.her7stelleri
.her7stellern
.her7stellers.
.her7stellt
.her7stellung.
.her7stellunge
.her3tr
.her5um.
.her3zä
.herz8hafti
.her4zi
.herzu6k
.hi4
.hin7aus.
.hinder7nis.
.hinder7niss
.hin7ein.
.hinter7grund.
.ho2
.hoch3b
.hoch7druck.
.hoch7schule.
.hoch7schulen.
.hoch7wasser.
.hoch7zeit.
.hol7stein.
.hol7steins
.hor2
.hölz3c
.hörig5k
.hös1
.hub2s
.huf1
.hundertacht7u
.hundertdrei7u
.hundertfünf7u
.hundertneun7u
.hundertsechs7
.hundertvier7u
.hundertzwei7
.hüt7chen.
.hypo7theken.
.hypo7thes
.ide2
.ig2
.il1
.il2t
.im2k
.im7missione
.im7mobilien.
.im1pe
.im1pu
.in2an
.in3b
.in4bes
.in4bet
.in3dem
.in3des
.in5dex.
.in5dexe
.indi5ge
.in3dik
.in7dizien.
.in1es
.in7flation.
.in7flationä
.in7formatik.
.in7formatike
.in7formation.
.in7formatione
.in4geb
